Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 6

Assessors of Property and Assessments

6-55-601. Municipal assessor of property.

The governing body of any municipality is authorized to:

Elect an assessor of property, who shall be required to make and subscribe to an oath as provided by the general laws of the state for county assessors of property;

Prescribe the bond that the assessor of property shall give; and

Fix the assessor of property's compensation and the compensation of any and all deputies or employees.

Acts 1957, ch. 391, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-729; Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1 provided that the code commission is directed to change all references to “tax assessor”, wherever such references appear, to “assessor of property”, as such sections are amended or volumes are replaced. See § 1-1-116.

Cross-References. Oath of county assessor, § 67-1-507.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 92.

6-55-602. Procedure for assessments.

All assessments made by an assessor of property elected pursuant to this part shall be made in accordance with the laws of the state by which such property is assessed for county purposes.

Acts 1957, ch. 391, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-730; Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1 provided that the code commission is directed to change all references to “tax assessor”, wherever such references appear, to “assessor of property”, as such sections are amended or volumes are replaced. See § 1-1-116.

Cross-References. Assessment of property, title 67, ch. 5, parts 5-15.

6-55-603. Adoption of county assessments.

In the event an assessor of property is not so elected, the governing body of any municipality may adopt, by ordinance or resolution, the assessments made by the county assessor of property within the confines of the municipality, and have the assessments as made by the county assessor of property copied and entered on the tax books of the municipality.

Acts 1957, ch. 391, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-731; Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1 provided that the code commission is directed to change all references to “tax assessor”, wherever such references appear, to “assessor of property”, as such sections are amended or volumes are replaced. See § 1-1-116.

6-55-604. Correction and equalization of assessments.

The governing body of any municipality may provide by ordinance or resolution for the correction of erroneous assessments, and for equalization of assessments made by the assessor of property.

Acts 1957, ch. 391, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-732; Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1 provided that the code commission is directed to change all references to “tax assessor”, wherever such references appear, to “assessor of property”, as such sections are amended or volumes are replaced. See § 1-1-116.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 95.

6-55-605. Construction of part.

This part shall not be construed to alter or conflict with any other method provided by law that provides for a municipal assessor of property, or for equalization or correction of municipal tax assessments, or for an assessor and equalization or correction of assessments.

Acts 1957, ch. 391, § 5; T.C.A., § 6-733; Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1 provided that the code commission is directed to change all references to “tax assessor”, wherever such references appear, to “assessor of property”, as such sections are amended or volumes are replaced. See § 1-1-116.